Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 3. Relations of Members and Managers to Persons Dealing with Limited Liability Company

§ 4041.
No agency power of member as member.

A member is not an agent of a limited liability company solely by reason of being a member.

A person’s status as a member does not prevent or restrict law other than this title from imposing liability on a limited liability company because of the person’s conduct.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.

§ 4042.
Liability of members and managers.

The debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited liability company, whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise:

are solely the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the company; and

do not become the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a member or manager solely by reason of the member acting as a member or the manager acting as a manager.

The failure of a limited liability company to observe any particular formalities relating to the exercise of its power or management of its activities is not a ground for imposing liability on a member or manager for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the company.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 17

, § 2.